utilities/dictionaries/ltg_LTG-Latgalian.dic
aizceļt/0GLN27-
aizdēt/0GMN27-
aizdzeļt/0GLN27-
aizdzert/0GLN27-
aizgruobt/0GMN28-
aizjimt/0GMN28-
aizjuot/0GLN27-
aizkluot/0GLN27-
aizknībt/0GMN28-
aizknuobt/0GMN28-
aizkruot/0GLN27-
aizkuopt/0GMN28-
aizlīt/0HLN27-
aizpyust/0GMN27-
aizrībt/0GMN28-
aizrīt/0HLN27-
aizsīt/0GLN27-
aizskrīt/0GLN27-
aizslīt/0GLN27-
aizsmeļt/0GLN27-
aizspert/0GLN27-
aizspīst/0GLN27-
aizstīpt/0GMN28-
aizstumt/GLN27-
aizstuot/0GLN27-
aizsvīst/0GLN27-
aizškeļt/0GLN27-
aizūrbt/0GMN28-
aizveļt/0GLN27-
aizzīst/0GLN27-
apaugt/0GMN27-
apceļt/0GLN27-
apdzeit/0GMN28-
apdzeļt/0GLN27-
apdzert/0GLN27-
apgruobt/0GMN28-
apjimt/0GMN28-
apjuot/0GLN27-
apkaļt/0GLN27-
apkluot/0GLN27-
apkuļt/0GLN27-
apkūpt/0GMN28-
aplīt/0HLN27-
apmaļt/0GLN27-
apmeit/0GLN27-
apneit/0GLN27-
appyust/0GMN27-
aprīt/0HLN27-
apsīt/0GLN27-
apskrīt/0GLN27-
apspert/0GLN27-
apspīst/0GLN27-
apsprīst/0GLN27-
apstīpt/0GMN28-
apstumt/0GLN27-
apstuot/0GLN27-
apsvīst/0GLN27-
apveļt/0GLN27-
apzeist/0GLN27-
apzīst/0GLN27-
ataugt/0GMN27-
atceļt/0GLN27-
atdēt/0GMN27-
atdzeit/0GMN28-
atdzeļt/0GLN27-
atdzert/0GLN27-
atjimt/0GMN28-
atjuot/0GLN27-
atkaļt/0GLN27-
atkluot/0GLN27-
atknībt/0GMN28-
atknuobt/0GMN28-
atkuļt/0GLN27-
atkuopt/0GMN28-
atlīt/0HLN27-
atneit/0GLN27-
atpyust/0GMN27-
atrībt/0GMN28-
atrīt/0HLN27-
atsīt/0GLN27-
atskrīt/0GLN27-
atslīt/0GLN27-
atspert/0GLN27-
atspīst/0GLN27-
atstīpt/0GMN28-
atstumt/0GLN27-
atstuot/0GLN27-
atsvīst/0GLN27-
atšīpt/0GMN28-
atškeļt/0GLN27-
atšuopt/0GMN28-
atveļt/0GLN27-
atzeist/0GLN27-
augt/GMN27-
ceļt/GLN27-
daaugt/0GMN27-
daceļt/0GLN27-
dadzeit/0GMN28-
dadzert/0GLN27-
dajimt/0GMN28-
dajuot/0GLN27-
dakuopt/0GMN28-
dalīt/0HLN27-
dapyust/0GMN27-
dasīt/0GLN27-
daskrīt/0GLN27-
daslīt/0GLN27-
daspert/0GLN27-
daspīst/0GLN27-
dastumt/0GLN27-
dastuot/0GLN27-
dasvīst/0GLN27-
daveļt/0GLN27-
dazeist/0GLN27-
dazīst/0GLN27-
dēt/GMN27-
dūbt/GMN28-
dzeit/GMN28
dzeļt/GLN27-
dzert/GLN27-
grebt/GMN28-
gruobt/GMN28-
izaugt/0GMN27-
izceļt/0GLN27-
izdēt/0GMN27-
izdūbt/0GMN28-
izdzert/0GLN27-
izgluobt/0GMN28-
izgrebt/0GMN28-
izgruobt/0GMN28-
izjimt/0GMN28-
izjuot/0GLN27-
izkaļt/0GLN27-
izkluot/0GLN27-
izkuļt/0GLN27-
izkuopt/0GMN28-
izlīt/0HLN27-
izmaļt/0GLN27-
izmeit/0GLN27-
izneit/0GLN27-
izrīt/0HLN27-
izsīt/0GLN27-
izskrīt/0GLN27-
izsmeļt/0GLN27-
izspert/0GLN27-
izspīst/0GLN27-
izsprīst/0GLN27-
izstīpt/0GMN28-
izstumt/0GLN27-
izsvīst/0GLN27-
izšuopt/0GMN28-
izūrbt/0GMN28-
izveļt/0GLN27-
izvībt/0GMN28-
izzeist/0GLN27-
izzīst/0GLN27-
īaugt/0GMN27-
īceļt/0GLN27-
īdēt/0GMN27-
īdūbt/0GMN28-
īdzeļt/0GLN27-
īdzert/0GLN27-
īgrebt/0GMN28-
īgruobt/0GMN28-
ījuot/0GLN27-
īkaļt/0GLN27-
īkluot/0GLN27-
īknībt/0GMN28-
īknuobt/0GMN28-
īkuopt/0GMN28-
īkūpt/0GMN28-
īlīt/0HLN27-
īmaļt/0GLN27-
īmeit/0GLN27-
īneit/0GLN27-
īpyust/0GMN27-
īrībt/0GMN28-
īsīt/0GLN27-
īskrīt/0GLN27-
īslīt/0GLN27-
īsmeļt/0GLN27-
īspert/0GLN27-
īspīst/0GLN27-
īstīpt/0GMN28-
īstumt/0GLN27-
īstuot/0GLN27-
īsvīst/0GLN27-
īškeļt/0GLN27-
īškībt/0GMN28-
īūrbt/0GMN28-
īveļt/0GLN27-
īzeist/0GLN27-
īzīst/0GLN27-
jimt/GMN28-
juot/GLN27-
kaļt/GLN27-
kluot/GLN27-
knībt/GMN28-
kruot/GLN27-
kuļt/GLN27-
kuopt/GMN28-
kūpt/GMN28-
līt/HLN27-
maļt/GLNgln27-
meit/GLN27-
nūaugt/0GMN27-
nūceļt/0GLN27-
nūdēt/0GMN27-
nūdzeit/0GMN28-
nūdzeļt/0GLN27-
nūdzert/0GLN27-
nūgruobt/0GMN28-
nūjimt/0GMN28-
nūjuot/0GLN27-
nūkaļt/0GLN27-
nūkluot/0GLN27-
nūknībt/0GMN28-
nūknuobt/0GMN28-
nūkuļt/0GLN27-
nūkuopt/0GMN28-
nūmaļt/0GLN27-
nūmeit/0GLN27-
nūpyust/0GMN27-
nūrībt/0GMN28-
nūrīt/0HLN27-
nūsīt/0GLN27-
nūskrīt/0GLN27-
nūslīt/0GLN27-
nūsmeļt/0GLN27-
nūspert/0GLN27-
nūspīst/0GLN27-
nūsprīst/0GLN27-
nūstīpt/0GMN28-
nūstumt/0GLN27-
nūsvīst/0GLN27-
nūšīpt/0GMN28-
nūškeļt/0GLN27-
nūškībt/0GMN28-
nūšuopt/0GMN28-
nūveļt/0GLN27-
nūzeist/0GLN27-
nūzīst/0GLN27-
paaugt/0GMN27-
paceļt/0GLN27-
padzeit/0GMN28-
padzert/0GLN27-
pagluobt/0GMN28-
pagruobt/0GMN28-
pajimt/0GMN28-
pajuot/0GLN27-
pakaļt/0GLN27-
pakluot/0GLN27-
pakuopt/0GMN28-
pakūpt/0GMN28-
palīt/0HLN27-
pamaļt/0GLN27-
pameit/0GLN27-
paneit/0GLN27-
papyust/0GMN27-
parīt/0HLN27-
pasīt/0GLN27-
paskrīt/0GLN27-
paslīt/0GLN27-
pasmeļt/0GLN27-
paspert/0GLN27-
paspīst/0GLN27-
pasprīst/0GLN27-
pastīpt/0GMN28-
pastumt/0GLN27-
pasvīst/0GLN27-
paškībt/0GMN28-
paūrbt/0GMN28-
paveļt/0GLN27-
pazeist/0GLN27-
pazīst/0GLN27-
pyust/GMN27-
pīaugt/0GMN27-
pīceļt/0GLN27-
pīdēt/0GMN27-
pīdzeit/0GMN28-
pīdzert/0GLN27-
pīgruobt/0GMN28-
pījimt/0GMN28-
pījuot/0GLN27-
pīkaļt/0GLN27-
pīkluot/0GLN27-
pīknībt/0GMN28-
pīknuobt/0GMN28-
pīkruot/0GLN27-
pīkuļt/0GLN27-
pīkuopt/0GMN28-
pīkūpt/0GMN28-
pīlīt/0HLN27-
pīmaļt/0GLN27-
pīpyust/0GMN27-
pīrībt/0GMN28-
pīrīt/0HLN27-
pīsīt/0GLN27-
pīskrīt/0GLN27-
pīslīt/0GLN27-
pīsmeļt/0GLN27-
pīspert/0GLN27-
pīspīst/0GLN27-
pīsprīst/0GLN27-
pīstīpt/0GMN28-
pīstumt/0GLN27-
pīstuot/0GLN27-
pīsvīst/0GLN27-
pīškeļt/0GLN27-
pīškībt/0GMN28-
pīšuopt/0GMN28-
pīzeist/0GLN27-
pīzīst/0GLN27-
puorceļt/0GLN27-
puordzeit/0GMN28-
puordzert/0GLN27-
puorjimt/0GMN28-
puorjuot/0GLN27-
puorkaļt/0GLN27-
puorkluot/0GLN27-
puorknībt/0GMN28-
puorknuobt/0GMN28-
puorkuopt/0GMN28-
puorlīt/0HLN27-
puormaļt/0GLN27-
puormeit/0GLN27-
puorneit/0GLN27-
puorpyust/0GMN27-
puorrīt/0HLN27-
puorsīt/0GLN27-
puorskrīt/0GLN27-
puorslīt/0GLN27-
puorspert/0GLN27-
puorspīst/0GLN27-
puorsprīst/0GLN27-
puorstīpt/0GMN28-
puorstuot/0GLN27-
puorškeļt/0GLN27-
puorveļt/0GLN27-
rīt/HLN27-
saceļt/0GLN27-
sadzeit/0GMN28-
sadzert/0GLN27-
sagruobt/0GMN28-
sajuot/0GLN27-
sakluot/0GLN27-
saknuobt/0GMN28-
sakuļt/0GLN27-
sakūpt/0GMN28-
samaļt/0GLN27-
saneit/0GLN27-
sarībt/0GMN28-
sasīt/0GLN27-
saslīt/0GLN27-
saspert/0GLN27-
sasprīst/0GLN27-
sastuot/0GLN27-
sašīpt/0GMN28-
saškībt/0GMN28-
saveļt/0GLN27-
sazeist/0GLN27-
sīt/GLNgln27-
slīt/GLN27gln-
smeļt/GLN27-
spīst/GLN27-
stīpt/GMN28-
svīst/GLN27-
škeļt/GLN27-
šuopt/GMN28-
veļt/GLN27-
zeist/GLNglOCn27-
